Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1208
Defacing a firearm;
penalty.

(1) Any person who intentionally removes,
defaces, covers, alters, or destroys the manufacturer's identification mark
or serial number or other distinguishing numbers on any firearm commits the
offense of defacing a firearm.

(2) Defacing a firearm is a Class III felony.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 240;

Laws 2009, LB63, § 17.